Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Chapter 10. State Highway System.

Cross references. —

For definitions and penalties applicable to this chapter, see AS

19.59.001

and

19.59.002

. For highway safety program, see AS

28.90.040

.

Administrative Code. —

For toll highways, see 17 AAC 35.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Alaska Department of Transportation and Public Facilities has management authority over R.S. 2477 [43 U.S.C. § 932 (now repealed)] highways where they occur on non-state land. Where such highways occur on state land, the Alaska Department of Transportation and the state agency having management authority over the state land in question have concurrent authority over the highway. September 14, 1981 Op. Att’y Gen.

A highway created by public user under provisions of R.S. 2477 [43 U.S.C. § 932 (now repealed)] cannot be narrowly restricted to a particular type of public travel except in those situations where road closure to certain vehicular use is necessary to protect road surfaces during certain seasons of the year. February 1, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen.

The cases seem divided on the question of whether a public right-of-way created under federal grant may be legally abandoned by non-use. For this and other reasons, the Circle-Fairbanks Trail should be expressly reserved in those areas where its physical existence is no longer apparent. February 1, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen.